test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VV_makomii_gt-norm.yaml
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiinyimishinaanidig, gimakomiinyimishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiinyimishinaanidig, gimakomiinyimishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimakomiinyimishiwaabaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimakomiinyimishiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimakomiinyimishiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimakomiinyimishiwaadig, gimakomiinyimishiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiinyimishiwaadig, gimakomiinyimishiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiinyimishiwaadig, gimakomiinyimishiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gimakomiinsimishinaanibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gimakomiinsimishinaanibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gimakomiinsimishinaanibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimakomiinsimishinaanidig, gimakomiinsimishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiinsimishinaanidig, gimakomiinsimishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiinsimishinaanidig, gimakomiinsimishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimakomiinsimishiwaabaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimakomiinsimishiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimakomiinsimishiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimakomiinsimishiwaadig, gimakomiinsimishiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiinsimishiwaadig, gimakomiinsimishiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiinsimishiwaadig, gimakomiinsimishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omakomiinyimishiniibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omakomiinyimishiniibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omakomiinyimishiniibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiinyimishiniidig, omakomiinyimishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiinyimishiniidig, omakomiinyimishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiinyimishiniidig, omakomiinyimishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omakomiinyimishiwaabaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omakomiinyimishiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omakomiinyimishiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiinyimishiwaadig, omakomiinyimishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiinyimishiwaadig, omakomiinyimishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiinyimishiwaadig, omakomiinyimishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omakomiinsimishiniibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omakomiinsimishiniibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omakomiinsimishiniibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiinsimishiniidig, omakomiinsimishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiinsimishiniidig, omakomiinsimishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiinsimishiniidig, omakomiinsimishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omakomiinsimishiwaabaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omakomiinsimishiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omakomiinsimishiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiinsimishiwaadig, omakomiinsimishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiinsimishiwaadig, omakomiinsimishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiinsimishiwaadig, omakomiinsimishiwaadog]
     
